Missouri, session 2026, HB1808.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.057, to read as follows:
537.057. 1. A person who sustains bodily injury or injury to real or personal
property as a result of the negligent provision of alcoholic beverages by a social host to a
person who has attained twenty-one years of age may recover damages from the social
host only if:
(1) The social host willfully and knowingly provided alcoholic beverages either:
(a) To a person who was visibly intoxicated in the social host's presence; or
(b) To a person who was visibly intoxicated under circumstances manifesting
reckless disregard of the consequences as affecting the life or property of another;
(2) The social host provided alcoholic beverages to the visibly intoxicated person
under circumstances that created an unreasonable risk of foreseeable harm to the life or
property of another, and the social host failed to exercise reasonable care and diligence
to avoid the foreseeable harm; and
(3) The injury arose out of an accident caused by the negligent operation of a
vehicle by the visibly intoxicated person who was provided alcoholic beverages by the
social host.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1808 2
2. To determine the liability of a social host under subsection 1 of this section, if a
test to determine the presence of alcohol in the blood indicates a blood alcohol
concentration of:
(1) Less than ten-hundredths of one percent by weight of alcohol in the blood,
there shall be an irrebuttable presumption that the person tested was not visibly
intoxicated in the social host's presence and that the social host did not provide alcoholic
beverages to the person under circumstances that manifested reckless disregard of the
consequences as affecting the life or property of another; or
(2) At least ten-hundredths of one percent but less than fifteen-hundredths of
one percent by weight of alcohol in the blood, there shall be a rebuttable presumption
that the person tested was not visibly intoxicated in the social host's presence and that
the social host did not provide alcoholic beverages to the person under circumstances
that manifested reckless disregard of the consequences as affecting the life or property
of another.
3. This section shall be the exclusive civil remedy for personal injury or property
damage resulting from the negligent provision of alcoholic beverages by a social host to
a person who has attained twenty-one years of age.
✔